Utah statutes.
63A-9-808.1.   Transfer of information technology equipment for persons with a disability.

(1)  As used in this section, " a person with a disability" means a person with a severe, chronic disability that:

(a)  is attributable to a mental or physical impairment or a combination of mental and physical impairments; and

(b)  is likely to continue indefinitely.

(2)  The division may transfer information technology equipment, or authorize the transfer of technology equipment by an agency, to a nonprofit entity for distribution to and use by a person with a disability.

(3)  Interagency transfers and sales of surplus property to state and local agencies within the 30-day period under Section 63A-9-808 shall have priority over transfers under Subsection (2).

(4)  The division shall annually report to the Division of Services for People With Disabilities the:

(a)  names of the nonprofit entities receiving transfers under Subsection (2); and

(b)  types and amounts of equipment received.

